test/src/morphology/N-puu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - puu: # Noun 'tree / puu' - full paradigm
     puu+N+Sg+Nom: puu
     puu+N+Sg+Gen: puun
     puu+N+Sg+Acc: [puu, puun]
     puu+N+Sg+Par: puudu
     puu+N+Sg+Tra: puukse
     puu+N+Sg+Abe: [puutta, puuta, puuttah]
     puu+N+Sg+Com: puunke
     puu+N+Sg+Ine: puus
     puu+N+Sg+Ela: [puuspäi, puus]
     puu+N+Sg+Ill: puuh
     puu+N+Sg+Ade: puul
     puu+N+Sg+Abl: [puulpäi, puul]
     puu+N+Sg+All: puule
     puu+N+Sg+Ess: puunnu
     puu+N+Sg+Ter: puussah
     puu+N+Sg+Apr: puulluo
     puu+N+Pl+Nom: puut
     puu+N+Pl+Gen: puuloin
     puu+N+Pl+Acc: puut
     puu+N+Pl+Par: puuloi
     puu+N+Pl+Tra: puuloikse
     puu+N+Pl+Abe: [puuloitta, puuloita, puuloittah]
     puu+N+Pl+Com: puuloinke
     puu+N+Pl+Ine: puulois
     puu+N+Pl+Ela: [puuloispäi, puulois]
     puu+N+Pl+Ill: puuloihe
     puu+N+Pl+Ade: puuloil
     puu+N+Pl+Abl: [puuloilpäi, puuloil]
     puu+N+Pl+All: puuloile
     puu+N+Pl+Ess: puuloinnu
     puu+N+Pl+Ins: puuloin
     puu+N+Pl+Apr: puuloilluo
     puu+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: puugi
     puu+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: puungi
     puu+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [puugi, puungi]
     puu+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: puudugi
     puu+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: puuksegi
     puu+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [puuttagi, puutagi, puuttahgi]
     puu+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: puunkegi
     puu+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: puusgi
     puu+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [puuspäigi, puusgi]
     puu+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: puuhgi
     puu+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: puulgi
     puu+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [puulpäigi, puulgi]
     puu+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: puulegi
     puu+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: puunnugi
     puu+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: puussahgi
     puu+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: puulluogi
     puu+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: puutgi
     puu+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: puuloingi
     puu+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: puutgi
     puu+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: puuloigi
     puu+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: puuloiksegi
     puu+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [puuloittagi, puuloitagi, puuloittahgi]
     puu+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: puuloinkegi
     puu+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: puuloisgi
     puu+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [puuloispäigi, puuloisgi]
     puu+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: puuloihegi
     puu+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: puuloilgi
     puu+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [puuloilpäigi, puuloilgi]
     puu+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: puuloilegi
     puu+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: puuloinnugi
     puu+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: puuloingi
     puu+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: puuloilluogi
